Tennessee, session 114, SB0323.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 70-1-206(a), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Name real property, infrastructure, improvements to infrastructure, or
features under the agency's jurisdiction.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0323
001784
- 1 -